Arkansas, session 2025, SB547.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 6-15-510(b), concerning a homeschooled
student's participation in an interscholastic activity at a private school,
is amended to read as follows:
(b) A private school may approve a homeschooled student to participate
in an interscholastic activity if:
(1) The the homeschooled student or his or her parent notifies
the administrative head of the private school in writing:
(A)(1) Of the homeschooled student's request to
participate in the interscholastic activity before the signup, tryout, or
participation deadlines established for students enrolled in the private
school; and
*TNL367*
03/20/2025 3:35:19 PM TNL367

SB547
(B)(2) That the homeschooled student has demonstrated
academic eligibility by obtaining:
(i)(A) A minimum test score of the thirtieth
percentile on the Stanford Achievement Test Series, Tenth Edition, or another
nationally recognized norm-referenced test in the previous twelve (12)
months; or
(ii)(B) A minimum score on a test approved by the
State Board of Education; and
(2) The homeschooled student lives within a twenty-five-mile
radius of the private school.


























03/20/2025 3:35:19 PM TNL367